Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska85-1,105
University of Nebraska Institute of Agriculture and Natural Resources; vice chancellor; duties.

The vice chancellor for the University of Nebraska Institute of Agriculture and Natural Resources shall be responsible for providing leadership for all agricultural and natural resources affairs in the University of Nebraska as they involve the office of chancellor of the University of Nebraska-Lincoln and the President and the Board of Regents of the University of Nebraska. He shall coordinate agricultural, natural resources, and related matters of the University of Nebraska-Lincoln. As senior agricultural and natural resources administrator in the University of Nebraska, he and the chancellor of the University of Nebraska-Lincoln shall together provide advice and counsel to and assist the President and Board of Regents of the University of Nebraska in agricultural, natural resources, and related matters.

Laws 1973, LB 149, § 4.